en: Bacon covered with cornmeal
fr: Bacon enrobé de farine de maïs

en: Smoked bacon covered with cornmeal
fr: Bacon fumé enrobé de farine de maïs

en: Dry bacon
fr: Bacon séché

en: Rindless pork back fat
fr: Bardière de porc découennée

en: Smoked bacon lardons
fr: Allumettes de bacon
hr: Dimljena slanina lardons
it: Lardo di bacon affumicato
nl: Gerookte hamspekjes
zh: 腊肉, 烟熏腊肉

en: Sliced bacon
bg: Нарязан бекон
de: Speckscheiben
fi: siivutettu pekoni
fr: Bacon en tranche, bacon en tranches
hr: Narezanu slaninu
hu: Szeletelt szalonna, Szeletelt bacon
it: Pancetta tagliata, Pancetta affettata
nl: Ham in plakjes
zh: 切片培根, 培根切片

en: Smoked bacon
bg: Пушен бекон
ca: Bacó fumat
de: geräucherter Speck
es: Tocino ahumado
fi: savustettu pekoni
fr: Bacon fumé
hr: Dimljena slanina
it: Pancetta affumicata
nl: Gerookte spek
zh: 烟熏培根

en: Unsmoked bacon
fr: Bacon non fumé
hr: Nedimljena slanina
nl: Ongerookte spek

en: Pig carcass, Pork carcass
fr: Carcasse de porc

en: Pork bones
fr: Os de porc

en: Pork offals
fr: Abats de porc

en: Frozen pork offals
fr: Abats de porc surgelés

en: Frozen pork meat
fr: Viande de porc surgelée

en: Ground pork meat
fr: Viande de porc hachée

en: Frozen ground pork meat
fr: Viande de porc hachée surgelée

en: Veal meat, veal
bg: Телешко месо
de: Kalbfleisch
es: Carne de ternera
fi: vasikanliha
fr: Viandes de veau, veau
hr: Teleće meso
it: Carne di vitello
ja: 仔牛肉
nl: Kalfsvlezen
pl: Cielęcina

en: Veal Orloff
es: Silla de ternera Orloff
fr: Veau Оrlov
hr: Teletina orloff
it: Vitello alla Orloff

en: Cooked veal meat
fr: Viandes de veau cuites, Viande de veau cuite

en: Smoked cooked veal meat
fr: Viandes de veau cuites fumées, Viande de veau cuite fumée

en: Grilled veal meat
fr: Viandes de veau grillées, Viande de veau cuite grillée